Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 31.3
COLORADO STATE UNIVERSITY - GLOBAL CAMPUS

Section

23-31.3-101. University established - role and mission.

There is established an online university to be known as Colorado state university - global campus, referred to in this article 31.3 as "CSU global campus". CSU global campus is a baccalaureate and graduate online university with the mission in Colorado of offering baccalaureate degree programs for nontraditional students in partnership with the Colorado community college system and selected master-level graduate programs. For baccalaureate degree students residing in Colorado, CSU global campus shall have moderately selective admission standards. CSU global campus shall comply with all applicable statutes and rules.

CSU global campus shall not offer associate of arts, associate of science, or associate of applied science degrees, bachelor of applied science degrees, or career and technical certificate programs. Additionally, CSU global campus will not offer concurrent enrollment programs, state-funded supplemental academic instruction, or state-funded developmental education courses.

Online baccalaureate degree programs that will be offered to students residing in Colorado and that did not exist prior to August 6, 2014, are subject to review and approval by the Colorado commission on higher education. In determining whether to approve an online baccalaureate degree program, the Colorado commission on higher education shall consider:

Whether the program is in the best interests of the state of Colorado;

Whether the program is cost-effective for Colorado students; and

Whether the program is sufficiently distinguishable from an existing online baccalaureate degree program being delivered by a state four-year institution of higher education, a state two-year institution of higher education, or jointly by a state two-year and state four-year institution of higher education.

In determining whether to approve an online baccalaureate degree program pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the Colorado commission on higher education may consult with other state institutions of higher education.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article added, (HB 12-1220), ch. 100, p. 332, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-114), ch. 144, p. 491, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 18-101), ch. 49, p. 485, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 19-1206), ch. 133, p. 605, § 18, effective April 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1206, see section 1 of chapter 133, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

23-31.3-102. Board of governors of the Colorado state university system to supervise.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the general supervision of CSU global campus and the control and direction of the funds and appropriations made thereto. The board has the power to receive, demand, and hold for the uses and purposes of CSU global campus all money, lands, and other property that may be donated, devised, or conveyed thereto and to utilize the same in such manner as shall best serve the objects and interests of CSU global campus.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article added, (HB 12-1220), ch. 100, p. 332, § 1, effective August 8.

23-31.3-103. Academic policy.

The president of CSU global campus, referred to in this article as the "president", in consultation with the governing council and the faculty, has the responsibility for making academic policy and governing the academic affairs of the institution.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article added, (HB 12-1220), ch. 100, p. 333, § 1, effective August 8.

23-31.3-104. President - duties.

The president is chief executive officer of CSU global campus, and it is the duty of the president to see that the rules of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system are observed and executed.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article added, (HB 12-1220), ch. 100, p. 333, § 1, effective August 8.

23-31.3-105. Board of governors - personnel power.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has authority over all personnel matters relating to the system, including CSU global campus. In accordance with section 23-5-117, the board may delegate all or part of its power over personnel matters. If such personnel powers are delegated to the president, then all employees of CSU global campus are under the direction and control of the president and shall be removable at the president's discretion. The president may fill vacancies of all employee positions as deemed necessary, subject to his or her personnel power.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article added, (HB 12-1220), ch. 100, p. 333, § 1, effective August 8.

23-31.3-106. President may be an instructor.

The president may perform the duties of an instructor, as the board of governors of the Colorado state university system shall determine.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article added, (HB 12-1220), ch. 100, p. 333, § 1, effective August 8.

23-31.3-107. Power to acquire land.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the power to take and hold, by gift, devise, or purchase, so much land as may become necessary for the location and construction of buildings, structures, and other facilities as may be required for the uses and purposes of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire article added, (HB 12-1220), ch. 100, p. 333, § 1, effective August 8.